Illinois, session 104th, SB2442.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Sections 11-401, 11-402, 11-403, and 11-404 as 6follows: 7    (625 ILCS 5/11-401)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-401)8    Sec. 11-401. Crash Motor vehicle crashes involving death 9or personal injuries. 10    (a) The driver of any vehicle, moped, low-speed electric 11bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle involved in a crash motor 12vehicle crashes resulting in personal injury to or death of 13any person shall immediately stop such vehicle, moped, 14low-speed electric bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle at the 15scene of such crash, or as close thereto as possible and shall 16then forthwith return to, and in every event shall remain at 17the scene of the crash until the requirements of Section 1811-403 have been fulfilled. Every such stop shall be made 19without obstructing traffic more than is necessary.20    (b) Any person who has failed to stop or to comply with the 21requirements of paragraph (a) shall, as soon as possible but 22in no case later than one-half hour after such motor vehicle 23crash, or, if hospitalized and incapacitated from reporting at   SB2442- 2 -LRB104 10398 LNS 20473 b1any time during such period, as soon as possible but in no case 2later than one-half hour after being discharged from the 3hospital, report the place of the crash, the date, the 4approximate time, the driver's name and address, the 5registration number of the vehicle, moped, low-speed electric 6bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle driven, and the names of all 7other occupants of such vehicle, moped, low-speed electric 8bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle, at a police station or 9sheriff's office near the place where such crash occurred. No 10report made as required under this paragraph shall be used, 11directly or indirectly, as a basis for the prosecution of any 12violation of paragraph (a).13    (b-1) Any person arrested for violating this Section is 14subject to chemical testing of his or her blood, breath, other 15bodily substance, or urine for the presence of alcohol, other 16drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds, or any 17combination thereof, as provided in Section 11-501.1, if the 18testing occurs within 12 hours of the time of the occurrence of 19the crash that led to his or her arrest. The person's driving 20privileges are subject to statutory summary suspension under 21Section 11-501.1 if he or she fails testing or statutory 22summary revocation under Section 11-501.1 if he or she refuses 23to undergo the testing. 24    For purposes of this Section, personal injury shall mean 25any injury requiring immediate professional treatment in a 26medical facility or doctor's office.  SB2442- 3 -LRB104 10398 LNS 20473 b1    (c) Any person failing to comply with paragraph (a) shall 2be guilty of a Class 4 felony.3    (d) Any person failing to comply with paragraph (b) is 4guilty of a Class 2 felony if the motor vehicle crash does not 5result in the death of any person. Any person failing to comply 6with paragraph (b) when the crash results in the death of any 7person is guilty of a Class 1 felony.8    (e) The Secretary of State shall revoke the driving 9privilege of any person convicted of a violation of this 10Section.11(Source: P.A. 102-982, eff. 7-1-23.) 12    (625 ILCS 5/11-402)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-402)13    Sec. 11-402. Crash Motor vehicle crash involving damage to 14vehicle, moped, low-speed electric bicycle, or low-speed gas 15bicycle. 16    (a) The driver of any vehicle, moped, low-speed electric 17bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle involved in a motor vehicle 18crash resulting only in damage to a vehicle, moped, low-speed 19electric bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle which is driven or 20attended by any person shall immediately stop such vehicle, 21moped, low-speed electric bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle at 22the scene of such motor vehicle crash or as close thereto as 23possible, but shall forthwith return to and in every event 24shall remain at the scene of such motor vehicle crash until the 25requirements of Section 11-403 have been fulfilled. A driver   SB2442- 4 -LRB104 10398 LNS 20473 b1does not violate this Section if the driver moves the vehicle, 2moped, low-speed electric bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle as 3soon as possible off the highway to the nearest safe location 4on an exit ramp shoulder, a frontage road, the nearest 5suitable cross street, or other suitable location that does 6not obstruct traffic and remains at that location until the 7driver has fulfilled the requirements of Section 11-403. Every 8such stop shall be made without obstructing traffic more than 9is necessary. If a damaged vehicle, moped, low-speed electric 10bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle is obstructing traffic 11lanes, the driver of the vehicle , moped, low-speed electric 12bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle must make every reasonable 13effort to move the vehicle, moped, low-speed electric bicycle, 14or low-speed gas bicycle or have it moved so as not to block 15the traffic lanes. 16    Any person failing to comply with this Section shall be 17guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.18    (b) Upon conviction of a violation of this Section, the 19court shall make a finding as to whether the damage to a 20vehicle, moped, low-speed electric bicycle, or low-speed gas 21bicycle is in excess of $1,000, and in such case a statement of 22this finding shall be reported to the Secretary of State with 23the report of conviction as required by Section 6-204 of this 24Code. Upon receipt of such report of conviction and statement 25of finding that the damage to a vehicle, moped, low-speed 26electric bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle is in excess of   SB2442- 5 -LRB104 10398 LNS 20473 b1$1,000, the Secretary of State shall suspend the driver's 2license or any nonresident's driving privilege.3    (c) If any peace officer or highway authority official 4finds (i) a vehicle, moped, low-speed electric bicycle, or 5low-speed gas bicycle standing upon a highway or toll highway 6in violation of a prohibition, limitation, or restriction on 7stopping, standing, or parking imposed under this Code or (ii) 8a disabled vehicle, moped, low-speed electric bicycle, or 9low-speed gas bicycle that obstructs the roadway of a highway 10or toll highway, the peace officer or highway authority 11official is authorized to move the vehicle, moped, low-speed 12electric bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle or to require the 13operator of the vehicle, moped, low-speed electric bicycle, or 14low-speed gas bicycle to move the vehicle, moped, low-speed 15electric bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle to the shoulder of 16the road, to a position where parking is permitted, or to 17public parking or storage premises. The removal may be 18performed by, or under the direction of, the peace officer or 19highway authority official or may be contracted for by local 20authorities. After the vehicle, moped, low-speed electric 21bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle has been removed, the peace 22officer or highway authority official shall follow appropriate 23procedures, as provided in Section 4-203 of this Code.24    (d) A towing service, its officers, and its employees are 25not liable for loss of or damages to any real or personal 26property that occurs as the result of the removal or towing of   SB2442- 6 -LRB104 10398 LNS 20473 b1any vehicle, moped, low-speed electric bicycle, or low-speed 2gas bicycle under subsection (c), as provided in subsection 3(b) of Section 4-213. 4(Source: P.A. 102-982, eff. 7-1-23.) 5    (625 ILCS 5/11-403)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-403)6    Sec. 11-403. Duty to give information and render aid. The 7driver of any vehicle, moped, low-speed electric bicycle, or 8low-speed gas bicycle involved in a motor vehicle crash 9resulting in injury to or death of any person or damage to any 10vehicle, moped, low-speed electric bicycle, or low-speed gas 11bicycle which is driven or attended by any person shall give 12the driver's name, address, registration number and owner of 13the vehicle, moped, low-speed electric bicycle, or low-speed 14gas bicycle the driver is operating and shall upon request and 15if available exhibit such driver's license to the person 16struck or the driver or occupant of or person attending any 17vehicle, moped, low-speed electric bicycle, or low-speed gas 18bicycle collided with and shall render to any person injured 19in such crash reasonable assistance, including the carrying or 20the making of arrangements for the carrying of such person to a 21physician, surgeon, or hospital for medical or surgical 22treatment, if it is apparent that such treatment is necessary 23or if such carrying is requested by the injured person.24    If none of the persons entitled to information pursuant to 25this Section is in condition to receive and understand such   SB2442- 7 -LRB104 10398 LNS 20473 b1information and no police officer is present, such driver 2after rendering reasonable assistance shall forthwith report 3such motor vehicle crash at the nearest office of a duly 4authorized police authority, disclosing the information 5required by this Section.6    Any person failing to comply with this Section shall be 7guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.8(Source: P.A. 102-982, eff. 7-1-23.) 9    (625 ILCS 5/11-404)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-404)10    Sec. 11-404. Duty upon damaging unattended vehicle, moped, 11low-speed electric bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle or other 12property. 13    (a) The driver of any vehicle, moped, low-speed electric 14bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle which collides with or is 15involved in a motor vehicle crash with any vehicle, moped, 16low-speed electric bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle which is 17unattended, or other property, resulting in any damage to such 18other vehicle, moped, low-speed electric bicycle, or low-speed 19gas bicycle or property shall immediately stop and shall then 20and there either locate and notify the operator or owner of 21such vehicle, moped, low-speed electric bicycle, or low-speed 22gas bicycle or other property of the driver's name, address, 23registration number and owner of the vehicle, moped, low-speed 24electric bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle the driver was 25operating or shall attach securely in a conspicuous place on   SB2442- 8 -LRB104 10398 LNS 20473 b1or in the vehicle or other property struck a written notice 2giving the driver's name, address, registration number and 3owner of the vehicle, moped, low-speed electric bicycle, or 4low-speed gas bicycle the driver was driving and shall without 5unnecessary delay notify the nearest office of a duly 6authorized police authority and shall make a written report of 7such crash when and as required in Section 11-407. Every such 8stop shall be made without obstructing traffic more than is 9necessary. If a damaged vehicle, moped, low-speed electric 10bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle is obstructing traffic 11lanes, the driver of the vehicle, moped, low-speed electric 12bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle must make every reasonable 13effort to move the vehicle, moped, low-speed electric bicycle, 14or low-speed gas bicycle or have it moved so as not to block 15the traffic lanes. 16    (b) Any person failing to comply with this Section shall 17be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.18    (c) If any peace officer or highway authority official 19finds (i) a vehicle, moped, low-speed electric bicycle, or 20low-speed gas bicycle standing upon a highway or toll highway 21in violation of a prohibition, limitation, or restriction on 22stopping, standing, or parking imposed under this Code or (ii) 23a disabled vehicle, moped, low-speed electric bicycle, or 24low-speed gas bicycle that obstructs the roadway of a highway 25or toll highway, the peace officer or highway authority 26official is authorized to move the vehicle, moped, low-speed   SB2442- 9 -LRB104 10398 LNS 20473 b1electric bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle or to require the 2operator of the vehicle, moped, low-speed electric bicycle, or 3low-speed gas bicycle to move the vehicle, moped, low-speed 4electric bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle to the shoulder of 5the road, to a position where parking is permitted, or to 6public parking or storage premises. The removal may be 7performed by, or under the direction of, the peace officer or 8highway authority official or may be contracted for by local 9authorities. After the vehicle, moped, low-speed electric 10bicycle, or low-speed gas bicycle has been removed, the peace 11officer or highway authority official shall follow appropriate 12procedures, as provided in Section 4-203 of this Code.13    (d) A towing service, its officers, and its employees are 14not liable for loss of or damages to any real or personal 15property that occurs as the result of the removal or towing of 16any vehicle, moped, low-speed electric bicycle, or low-speed 17gas bicycle under subsection (c), as provided in subsection 18(b) of Section 4-213. 19(Source: P.A. 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 103-1047, eff. 1-1-25.)